Washington statutes.
RCW 24.28.030

General rights and liabilities.

As a business corporation said grange, after having complied with RCW 24.28.020, shall be to all intents and purposes a domestic corporation, with all the rights, privileges and immunities allowed, and all the liabilities imposed by chapter one of the act entitled "an act to provide for the formation of corporations," approved November 13, 1873.

[ 1875 p 98 s 3; RRS s 3903.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: The reference to chapter one of the 1873 act relates to the general corporation act in effect at the time the above section was enacted. Such general corporation laws were also compiled as Code 1881 ss 2421-2449. See also table of prior laws following the Title 23 RCW digest.